Massachusetts, session 194th, H4283.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 13 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following new section:-
Section 110. (a) There shall be a board of registration of irrigation contractors, referred to
hereafter as the board, consisting of seven members to be appointed by the governor, all
residents of the commonwealth, four of whom shall have been engaged in the irrigation
contracting industry for a period of not less than five years prior to their appointment, two of
whom shall have experience as manufacturer or distributor of irrigation equipment, systems or
components thereof, and one of whom shall be a representative of the public who is a
professional engineer or landscape architect, subject to the provisions of section 9B. As the term
of office of a member of the board expires, their successor shall be appointed in like manner for
a term of four years. Any vacancy in the membership occurring other than by expiration of a
term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, but for the expired term
only. Each member shall continue to serve until the qualification of his successor. The governor
may also fill any vacancy in the board for the unexpired portion of the term.
of 10

(b) The board shall hold at least two regular meetings each year and may hold such
special meetings as it may determine. At the first regular meeting each year, the board shall
organize and choose a chair who shall be a member of the board and a secretary who may, but
need not, be a member of the board. At all meetings of the board a quorum shall consist of four
members.
(c) The members of the board shall serve without compensation, except that each
member shall receive from the commonwealth the necessary travel and other expenses actually
incurred by him in the performance of his duties.
SECTION 2. Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding at the end thereof the following ten new sections:-
Section 290. The following words as used in this section and sections 291 to 299,
inclusive, shall, unless the context otherwise requires, have the following meanings:
“Board”, the Board of Registration of Irrigation Contractors.
“Business permit”, a business that holds a permit as approved by the board entitling it to
be called by the title “irrigation contracting business” and which employs at least one irrigation
contractor, certified under the provisions of sections 291 to 299, inclusive.
“Certified irrigation contractor”, an individual who is certified as such with the Irrigation
Association, as approved by the board.“
“Irrigation Association”, the professional trade organization that establishes and
maintains industry standards and guidelines for certification, education and professional
of 10

development and promotes modern water management skills and techniques for irrigated
agriculture, turf, landscape, and golf.
“Irrigation contracting”, the construction, the subcontracting, installation, repair
maintenance, improvement, winterization, alteration and management of any portion of an
irrigation system.
“Irrigation contractor”, a person who holds a certificate entitling him to be called by the
title “irrigation contractor” in the commonwealth under the authority of the board.
“Irrigation system”, any assemblage of components, materials or special equipment
which is constructed and permanently installed predominantly underground for controlled
dispersion of water from any safe and suitable source, for the purpose of irrigating landscape
vegetation or the control of dust and erosion on landscaped areas, including integral pumping
systems and including required wiring within that system and connection to a public or private
water supply system under the terms and conditions of a contract. An irrigation system, when
connected to a potable water supply, shall include a connection beginning at the downstream side
of a professionally installed backflow prevention device as required under 248 CMR 10.00. An
irrigation system shall not include plumbing, or a plumbing system as defined in chapter 142.
“Professional engineer”, a person who, by reason of his special knowledge of the
mathematical and physical sciences and the principles and methods of engineering analysis and
design acquired by professional education and practical experience, is qualified to practice
engineering, as attested by his registration as a professional engineer; provided, however, that
registration as a professional engineer shall not qualify a person to practice as an engineer
licensed under chapter 146.
of 10

“Professional irrigation consultant”, an independent irrigation designer responsible for
the preparation of irrigations system plans and specifications, the observation of system
construction and recommendations for irrigation management and who derives more than 80 per
cent of their income from professional consulting.
Section 291. The board shall review applications for certification, register and issue
certificates of registration, take appropriate disciplinary action, including but not limited to the
assessment of penalties or the suspension or revocation of said certification, require continuing
education requirements, and maintain a current roster of irrigation contractors in the
commonwealth.
The board shall review applications for business permits, issue business permits to firms,
partnerships or corporations engaged in the business of irrigation contracting and define any
restrictions or requirements regarding the use of such permit.
The board shall take appropriate disciplinary action, including but not limited to the
assessment of penalties or the suspension or revocation of said business permit, and maintain a
current roster of permitted irrigation contracting businesses in the commonwealth.
The board may adopt, amend, and rescind such rules and regulations, not inconsistent
with other provisions of the General Laws, as it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of
this chapter.
Section 292. No person shall construct, subcontract , install, repair, improve, winterize, or
alter any portion of an irrigation system in the commonwealth nor shall they represent
themselves to be an irrigation contractor or use the title irrigation contractor in the
commonwealth on any advertisement, sign, title, card or other device to indicate that such person
of 10

is an irrigation contractor, unless such person shall have secured from the board a certificate of
registration as an irrigation contractor. A person may construct, install, repair, improve or alter
any portion of an irrigation system in the commonwealth if under the direct supervision of an
irrigation contractor.
Every holder of a certificate of such registration shall display it in a conspicuous place in
his principal office or place of employment, and on any plans specifically used in the
development, management, and installation of an irrigation system and on all advertisements,
signs, tiles, cards and vehicles.
No firm, partnership or corporation shall represent themselves as an irrigation contracting
business or use the title irrigation contracting business in the commonwealth on any
advertisement, sign, title, card or other device to indicate that such person is an irrigation
contracting business, to include sub-contracting unless such firm, partnership or corporation shall
have secured from the board a business permit as an irrigation contracting business or is acting
under the direct supervision of an irrigation contractor. Every holder of a business permit shall
display it in a conspicuous place in its principal office and on any vehicles used for such
commercial purposes.
Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a firm, partnership, or corporation from
using the title “irrigation contractor” or “irrigation contractors”, or similar title provided that the
practice of irrigation contracting by such firm, partnership or corporation shall be under the
professional and supervisory control of a person registered as an irrigation contractor and the
entity holds a valid business permit.
of 10

100 Section 293. Before being examined for registration as an irrigation contractor, each
101 applicant shall submit evidence to the board that they are at least 18 years of age. The board may
102 also take into consideration for expedited review whether an applicant is duly certified in good
103 standing with the nationally recognized Irrigation Association as a certified irrigation contractor.
104 Applications shall include but not be limited to the applicant’s name, home address, social
105 security number, and most recent W-2. Applicants shall attest, under penalty of law, that the
106 information provided in the application is true, accurate and complete and will acknowledge that
107 there are, or may be, significant civil and criminal penalties, including fines or imprisonment, for
108 knowingly submitting false, inaccurate or in- complete information or statements. Said
109 information and acknowledgements shall be completed on a form provided or approved by the
110 board. If, at any time, the board finds that an applicant obtained a landscape irrigation contractor
111 certificate or a business permit under false pretenses, such findings shall be cause for revocation.
112 Additional documentation may be required if the board deems it necessary to determine whether
113 the applicant meets the above criteria.
114 Section 294. Before being examined for an original business permit or renewal of a
115 business permit, applicants are required to provide proof of liability and workers compensation
116 policies. Applicants must also provide the name of the business, address, federal tax
117 identification number. Said proof of insurance and business information shall be completed on a
118 form provided or approved by the board and shall be issued in the name of the business permit
119 holder. The board shall be listed as the certificate holder and notified in any lapses of coverage.
120 Section 295. The board shall adopt rules and regulations including but not limited to the
121 establishment of an electronic registration system and shall publish appropriate announcements.
122 The board may require every applicant for registration as an irrigation contractor to establish, by
of 10

123 written examination through the Irrigation Association, his competency to plan, construct,
124 manage, install, and supervise the installation of irrigation contracting systems.
125 Section 296. The following shall not be required to be certified pursuant to sections 291
126 to 299, inclusive:
127 (a) An employee working under the direct supervision of an on-site irrigation contractor;
128 (b) A homeowner who installs an irrigation system at his or her place of residence;
129 (c) Anyone in the employ of a golf course for the purpose of maintaining or repairing an
130 existing irrigation system or the replacement of an existing irrigation system;
131 (d) Anyone installing an irrigation system to irrigate their own field crops, grain,
132 soybeans, hay, fruits, vegetables, Christmas trees, horticultural specialties to be offered for sale,
133 including nursery stock, ornamental shrubs, ornamental trees, flowers, and turf on turf farms;
134 (e) Vendors of irrigation contracting components, materials, or equipment who perform
135 only such functions as delivery, rendering of advice or assistance in the installation or normal
136 warranty service or exchange of defective or damaged goods;
137 (f) Duly certified and in good standing landscape architects and professional engineers;
138 and
139 (g) Professional irrigation consultant as defined by this statute.
140 Section 297. Applicants for certificates of registration and for business permits shall pay
141 a fee, to be established bi-annually by the secretary for administration and finance pursuant to
142 section 3B of chapter 7 and shall be paid to the board on or before the 31 day of January of every
of 10

143 other year. Each initial certificate of registration issued in accordance with this act shall expire
144 on January 31 of the second calendar year following issuance. All certificates of registration
145 issued thereafter shall remain valid for a period of two years and shall expire January 31 of the
146 second calendar year. A new permit issued anytime after the January 31 issuance date shall
147 remain valid until the regular January 31 date of expiration.
148 The board may assess a penalty to be added to the amount of the certificate for
149 delinquent payments.
150 Failure to renew certificate of registration within 60 days after notification by the board
151 that said certificate has expired, shall require such applicant to register anew and may require re-
152 examination, subject to the discretion of the board.
153 Fees for duplicate certificates shall also be established bi-annually by the secretary for
154 administration and finance and shall be collected at the time of the request for such documents.
155 Fees for business permits shall be determined bi-annually by the secretary for
156 administration and finance pursuant to section 3B of chapter 7 and shall be paid to the board.
157 Each initial business permit issued in accordance with this act shall expire on January 31 of the
158 second calendar year following issuance. All permits issued thereafter shall remain valid for a
159 period of two years and shall expire January 31 of the second calendar year. A new permit
160 issued anytime after the January 31 issuance date shall remain valid until the regular January 31
161 date of expiration.
162 Section 298. The board may refuse to issue, renew, suspend, or revoke the certificate of
163 registration or business permit upon proof satisfactory to the board:
of 10

164 (a) that the holder of such certificate of registration or business permit is in violation of
165 any provision of sections 291 to 299, inclusive, or of any rule or regulation promulgated by the
166 board;
167 (b) that such certificate of registration or business permit was obtained by fraud or
168 misrepresentation;
169 (c) that any money or thing of value, except fees prescribed or authorized by said
170 sections, was paid or received to secure the issuance of such certificate of registration or business
171 permit;
172 (d) that the holder of such certificate of registration or business permit has been guilty of
173 a felony;
174 (e) that the holder of such certificate of registration or business permit has been guilty of
175 fraud or deceit, or of gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct, in the use of the title of
176 irrigation contractor; or
177 (f) that the holder of such certificate of registration or business permit has permitted or
178 suffered his certificate to be affixed to any system plans that were not prepared by him or under
179 his personal supervision by his regularly employed subordinates.
180 The board may reissue a certificate of registration or business permit to any person whose
181 certificate of registration or business permit has been revoked. Application for the re-issuance of
182 a certificate of registration or business permit shall be made in such manner as the board may
183 direct.
184 Section 299. It shall be unlawful for any person to:
of 10

185 (a) hold himself as an irrigation contractor unless he is registered under the provisions of
186 sections 291 to 299, inclusive;
187 (b) present as his own the certificate of registration of another;
188 (c) give false or forged evidence to the board of registration or any member thereof in
189 obtaining a certificate;
190 (d) falsely impersonate any other registrant of like or different name;
191 (e) use or attempt to use a certificate of registration that has been revoked; or
192 (f) otherwise violate any of the provisions of said sections.
193 A fine of not less than 1,500 dollars nor more than 2,500 dollars, or by imprisonment for
194 not more than one year, or both shall be set for a first offense. A fine of not less than 2,500
195 dollars nor more than 5,000 dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than two year, or both shall
196 be set for each and every subsequent offense. Violations shall be considered unfair and
197 deceptive acts and subject to the provisions of chapter 93A.
of 10